Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.180

Rules of practice and forms of process in supreme court.

The supreme court may from time to time institute such rules of practice and prescribe such forms of process to be used in such court and in the court en banc and each of its departments, and for the keeping of the dockets, records and proceedings, and for the regulation of such court, including the court en banc and in departments, as may be deemed most conducive to the due administration of justice.

[ 1909 c 24 s 8; 1890 p 323 s 12; RRS s 13.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. Title 1 RAP and RAP 18.10.